Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201460-383.02
Low-speed vehicle; registration;
fee.

For
the registration of every low-speed vehicle, the fee shall be fifteen dollars.

Laws 2011, LB289, § 16.